Hawaii statutes.
§653-16 Same; priority of payments.
The order of precedence established by section 653-15 shall not be disturbed by
the fact of a later action being carried to final judgment sooner than the
earlier in point of such service upon the garnishee, but in such case the
garnishee shall pay or cause to be paid on account of the earlier judgment only
such sums as are payable upon the judgment from the amounts which shall
thereafter become due and payable to the beneficiary. All amounts sequestered
on account of the earlier action shall be held to await the result thereof,
when, if final judgment passes against the beneficiary, the amount sequestered
and held shall be applied in payment of the judgment. In case such amounts do
not suffice to satisfy the judgment, then all judgments obtained in later
actions shall be again postponed to that in the earlier action, until it is
satisfied. [L 1890, c 50, §15; RL 1925, §2860; RL 1935, §4305; RL 1945, §10336;
RL 1955, §238-16; HRS §653-16]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next